Illinois, session 104th, HB2529.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-170 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-170)7    Sec. 15-170. Senior citizens homestead exemption. 8    (a) An annual homestead exemption limited, except as 9described here with relation to cooperatives or life care 10facilities, to a maximum reduction set forth below from the 11property's value, as equalized or assessed by the Department, 12is granted for property that is occupied as a residence by a 13person 65 years of age or older who is liable for paying real 14estate taxes on the property and is an owner of record of the 15property or has a legal or equitable interest therein as 16evidenced by a written instrument, except for a leasehold 17interest, other than a leasehold interest of land on which a 18single family residence is located, which is occupied as a 19residence by a person 65 years or older who has an ownership 20interest therein, legal, equitable or as a lessee, and on 21which he or she is liable for the payment of property taxes. 22Before taxable year 2004, the maximum reduction shall be 23$2,500 in counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and   HB2529- 2 -LRB104 09385 HLH 19444 b1$2,000 in all other counties. For taxable years 2004 through 22005, the maximum reduction shall be $3,000 in all counties. 3For taxable years 2006 and 2007, the maximum reduction shall 4be $3,500. For taxable years 2008 through 2011, the maximum 5reduction is $4,000 in all counties. For taxable year 2012, 6the maximum reduction is $5,000 in counties with 3,000,000 or 7more inhabitants and $4,000 in all other counties. For taxable 8years 2013 through 2016, the maximum reduction is $5,000 in 9all counties. For taxable years 2017 through 2022, the maximum 10reduction is $8,000 in counties with 3,000,000 or more 11inhabitants and $5,000 in all other counties. For taxable 12years 2023 through 2025 and thereafter, the maximum reduction 13is $8,000 in counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and 14counties that are contiguous to a county of 3,000,000 or more 15inhabitants and $5,000 in all other counties. For taxable 16years 2026 and thereafter, the maximum reduction is $8,000 in 17all counties. 18    (b) For land improved with an apartment building owned and 19operated as a cooperative, the maximum reduction from the 20value of the property, as equalized by the Department, shall 21be multiplied by the number of apartments or units occupied by 22a person 65 years of age or older who is liable, by contract 23with the owner or owners of record, for paying property taxes 24on the property and is an owner of record of a legal or 25equitable interest in the cooperative apartment building, 26other than a leasehold interest. For land improved with a life   HB2529- 3 -LRB104 09385 HLH 19444 b1care facility, the maximum reduction from the value of the 2property, as equalized by the Department, shall be multiplied 3by the number of apartments or units occupied by persons 65 4years of age or older, irrespective of any legal, equitable, 5or leasehold interest in the facility, who are liable, under a 6contract with the owner or owners of record of the facility, 7for paying property taxes on the property. In a cooperative or 8a life care facility where a homestead exemption has been 9granted, the cooperative association or the management firm of 10the cooperative or facility shall credit the savings resulting 11from that exemption only to the apportioned tax liability of 12the owner or resident who qualified for the exemption. Any 13person who willfully refuses to so credit the savings shall be 14guilty of a Class B misdemeanor. Under this Section and 15Sections 15-175, 15-176, and 15-177, "life care facility" 16means a facility, as defined in Section 2 of the Life Care 17Facilities Act, with which the applicant for the homestead 18exemption has a life care contract as defined in that Act.19    (c) When a homestead exemption has been granted under this 20Section and the person qualifying subsequently becomes a 21resident of a facility licensed under the Assisted Living and 22Shared Housing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized 23Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community 24Care Act, or the MC/DD Act, the exemption shall continue so 25long as the residence continues to be occupied by the 26qualifying person's spouse if the spouse is 65 years of age or   HB2529- 4 -LRB104 09385 HLH 19444 b1older, or if the residence remains unoccupied but is still 2owned by the person qualified for the homestead exemption.3    (d) A person who will be 65 years of age during the current 4assessment year shall be eligible to apply for the homestead 5exemption during that assessment year. Application shall be 6made during the application period in effect for the county of 7his residence.8    (e) Beginning with assessment year 2003, for taxes payable 9in 2004, property that is first occupied as a residence after 10January 1 of any assessment year by a person who is eligible 11for the senior citizens homestead exemption under this Section 12must be granted a pro-rata exemption for the assessment year. 13The amount of the pro-rata exemption is the exemption allowed 14in the county under this Section divided by 365 and multiplied 15by the number of days during the assessment year the property 16is occupied as a residence by a person eligible for the 17exemption under this Section. The chief county assessment 18officer must adopt reasonable procedures to establish 19eligibility for this pro-rata exemption.20    (f) The assessor or chief county assessment officer may 21determine the eligibility of a life care facility to receive 22the benefits provided by this Section, by affidavit, 23application, visual inspection, questionnaire or other 24reasonable methods in order to ensure that the tax savings 25resulting from the exemption are credited by the management 26firm to the apportioned tax liability of each qualifying   HB2529- 5 -LRB104 09385 HLH 19444 b1resident. The assessor may request reasonable proof that the 2management firm has so credited the exemption.3    (g) The chief county assessment officer of each county 4with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants shall provide to each 5person allowed a homestead exemption under this Section a form 6to designate any other person to receive a duplicate of any 7notice of delinquency in the payment of taxes assessed and 8levied under this Code on the property of the person receiving 9the exemption. The duplicate notice shall be in addition to 10the notice required to be provided to the person receiving the 11exemption, and shall be given in the manner required by this 12Code. The person filing the request for the duplicate notice 13shall pay a fee of $5 to cover administrative costs to the 14supervisor of assessments, who shall then file the executed 15designation with the county collector. Notwithstanding any 16other provision of this Code to the contrary, the filing of 17such an executed designation requires the county collector to 18provide duplicate notices as indicated by the designation. A 19designation may be rescinded by the person who executed such 20designation at any time, in the manner and form required by the 21chief county assessment officer.22    (h) The assessor or chief county assessment officer may 23determine the eligibility of residential property to receive 24the homestead exemption provided by this Section by 25application, visual inspection, questionnaire or other 26reasonable methods. The determination shall be made in   HB2529- 6 -LRB104 09385 HLH 19444 b1accordance with guidelines established by the Department.2    (i) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, for 3taxable years 2010 through 2018, each taxpayer who has been 4granted an exemption under this Section must reapply on an 5annual basis. 6    If a reapplication is required, then the chief county 7assessment officer shall mail the application to the taxpayer 8at least 60 days prior to the last day of the application 9period for the county. 10    For taxable years 2019 and thereafter, in counties with 113,000,000 or more inhabitants, a taxpayer who has been granted 12an exemption under this Section need not reapply. However, if 13the property ceases to be qualified for the exemption under 14this Section in any year for which a reapplication is not 15required under this Section, then the owner of record of the 16property shall notify the chief county assessment officer that 17the property is no longer qualified. In addition, for taxable 18years 2019 and thereafter, the chief county assessment officer 19of a county with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants shall enter 20into an intergovernmental agreement with the county clerk of 21that county and the Department of Public Health, as well as any 22other appropriate governmental agency, to obtain information 23that documents the death of a taxpayer who has been granted an 24exemption under this Section. Notwithstanding any other 25provision of law, the county clerk and the Department of 26Public Health shall provide that information to the chief   HB2529- 7 -LRB104 09385 HLH 19444 b1county assessment officer. The Department of Public Health 2shall supply this information no less frequently than every 3calendar quarter. Information concerning the death of a 4taxpayer may be shared with the county treasurer. The chief 5county assessment officer shall also enter into a data 6exchange agreement with the Social Security Administration or 7its agent to obtain access to the information regarding deaths 8in possession of the Social Security Administration. The chief 9county assessment officer shall, subject to the notice 10requirements under subsection (m) of Section 9-275, terminate 11the exemption under this Section if the information obtained 12indicates that the property is no longer qualified for the 13exemption. In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the 14assessor and the county clerk shall establish policies and 15practices for the regular exchange of information for the 16purpose of alerting the assessor whenever the transfer of 17ownership of any property receiving an exemption under this 18Section has occurred. When such a transfer occurs, the 19assessor shall mail a notice to the new owner of the property 20(i) informing the new owner that the exemption will remain in 21place through the year of the transfer, after which it will be 22canceled, and (ii) providing information pertaining to the 23rules for reapplying for the exemption if the owner qualifies. 24In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the chief 25county assessment official shall conduct, by no later than 26December 31 of the first year of each reassessment cycle, as   HB2529- 8 -LRB104 09385 HLH 19444 b1determined by Section 9-220, a review of all exemptions 2granted under this Section for the preceding reassessment 3cycle under this Section. The review shall be designed to 4ascertain whether any senior homestead exemptions have been 5granted erroneously. If it is determined that a senior 6homestead exemption has been erroneously applied to a 7property, the chief county assessment officer shall make use 8of the appropriate provisions of Section 9-275 in relation to 9the property that received the erroneous homestead exemption. 10    (j) In counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the 11county board may by resolution provide that if a person has 12been granted a homestead exemption under this Section, the 13person qualifying need not reapply for the exemption. In 14counties in which the county board passes such a resolution, 15the chief county assessment official shall, prior to the 16submission of the final abstract for the first year of each 17reassessment cycle, as determined by Section 9-215, review all 18exemptions granted for the preceding reassessment cycle under 19this Section. The review shall be designed to ascertain 20whether any senior homestead exemptions have been granted 21erroneously. 22    In counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if the 23assessor or chief county assessment officer requires annual 24application for verification of eligibility for an exemption 25once granted under this Section, the application shall be 26mailed to the taxpayer.  HB2529- 9 -LRB104 09385 HLH 19444 b1    (l) The assessor or chief county assessment officer shall 2notify each person who qualifies for an exemption under this 3Section that the person may also qualify for deferral of real 4estate taxes under the Senior Citizens Real Estate Tax 5Deferral Act. The notice shall set forth the qualifications 6needed for deferral of real estate taxes, the address and 7telephone number of county collector, and a statement that 8applications for deferral of real estate taxes may be obtained 9from the county collector.10    (m) Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates 11Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 12implementation of any mandate created by this Section.13(Source: P.A. 102-895, eff. 5-23-22; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.